Utah statutes.
13-34-106.   Responsibilities of division.

The division is responsible for the administration of this chapter, and shall do the following:

(1)  prescribe the contents of the registration statements required by this chapter relating to the quality of education and ethical and business practices;

(2)  issue:

(a)  certification of registration upon receipt and approval of the registration statement required under Section 13-34-107; and

(b)  a certificate of exemption under Section 13-34-107.5 upon receipt and approval of an application and verification that the requirements of Subsection 13-34-105(1)(e) and Section 13-34-107.5 are met;

(3)  receive, investigate, and make available for public inspection the registration statements filed by proprietary schools operating or intending to operate in the state;

(4)  maintain and publicize a list of proprietary schools for which a registration statement is on file with the division;

(5) on the division's own initiative or in response to a complaint filed with the division, do any of the following with respect to any institution subject to, or reasonably believed by the division to be subject to, this chapter:

(a)  investigate;

(b)  audit;

(c)  review;

(d)  appropriately act, including enforcing this chapter or any other law enforced by the division; and

(e)  refer a matter to:

(i)  another governmental entity; or

(ii)  the institution's accrediting body, if the institution is an exempt institution under Section 13-34-107.5;

(6)  negotiate and enter into interstate reciprocity agreements with other states, if in the judgment of the division, the agreements are or will help to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;

(7)  consent to the use of educational terms in business names in accordance with Section 13-34-114; and

(8)  establish and maintain a process for reviewing and appropriately acting on complaints concerning postsecondary educational institutions operating in the state, including enforcing applicable state laws.



Amended by Chapter 221, 2011 General Session

